Tennessee, session 114, SB0908.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-44-102(b)(1), is amended by
adding the following as a new subdivision:
(F) A body composed of representatives from several state government
agencies that seeks to promote and support the health of humans, animals, and the
environment through cooperation and collaboration across disciplines, including local,
state, and federal agencies, academic institutions, and outside partners.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-44-102(b)(2), is amended by
designating the existing language as subdivision (b)(2)(A) and adding the following as a new
subdivision (b)(2)(B):
(B) "Meeting" also means the convening of a governing body described under
subdivision (b)(1)(F).
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0908
002673
- 1 -